Florida, session 2026, SB1416.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 85 86 Section 1.âSection 101.7311, Florida Statutes, is created 87 to read: 88 101.7311âApplication of Elections Emergency Act.âIn the 89 event of an emergency, elections must be conducted in accordance 90 with the Elections Emergency Act which governs the suspension, 91 delay, rescheduling, contingency planning, and deployment of 92 election equipment necessary to ensure a safe and orderly 93 election. These provisions must be carried out in a manner that 94 upholds the integrity of elections administration, fosters trust 95 in elections, and secures the maximum possible participation of 96 eligible voters. 97 Section 2.âSubsection (3) of section 101.732, Florida 98 Statutes, is amended to read: 99 101.732âDefinitions relating to Elections Emergency Act.âAs 100 used in ss. 101.731-101.74: 101 (3)ââEmergencyâ means any occurrence, or threat thereof, 102 whether accidental, natural, or caused by human beings, in war 103 or in peace, that results or may result in substantial injury or 104 harm to the population or substantial damage to or loss of 105 property to the extent it will prohibit an election officerâs 106 ability to conduct a safe and orderly election or impair the 107 ability of voters to safely and accessibly cast their ballot in 108 accordance with state and federal requirements ensuring equal 109 opportunity for all eligible voters. 110 Section 3.âSection 101.7325, Florida Statutes, is created 111 to read: 112 101.7325âElection emergency.â 113 (1)âIf the Governor declares a state of emergency pursuant 114 to s. 252.36 less than 60 days before an election, the 115 supervisor of a county included in the state of emergency 116 declaration may request approval from the Secretary of State to 117 take any of the following actions necessary while the emergency 118 declaration continues to include the county as an affected area: 119 (a)âNotwithstanding s. 101.657(1)(d), allow early voting to 120 occur the day before an election. 121 (b)âNotwithstanding ss. 101.657 and 101.71, allow election 122 day voting at early voting sites. The request must set forth 123 sufficient facts to establish that a sufficient number of 124 designated early voting sites, or sites that may be designated 125 under subsection (3) are unavailable due to the emergency. For 126 purposes of this paragraph, reasons that a polling place may be 127 unavailable include, but are not limited to, the polling place 128 no longer being safe for occupancy, the polling place being 129 located in an area that is currently dangerous or difficult to 130 travel to and from, or the polling place lacking adequate 131 utilities. An early voting site designated as a polling place 132 under this paragraph must, to the maximum extent practicable, be 133 geographically located so as to provide all voters in the area 134 with an equal opportunity to cast a ballot. 135 (c)âNotwithstanding the designation deadline in s. 136 101.69(2)(b), designate additional secure ballot intake 137 stations. The request must identify the locations of the 138 additional secure ballot intake stations. 139 (d)âNotwithstanding s. 102.012(2), appoint inspectors and 140 clerks who are registered qualified electors of this state but 141 who are not registered qualified electors of the applicable 142 county. 143 (2)âEach supervisor who submits a request pursuant to 144 subsection (1) shall, to the extent practicable, submit all such 145 requests at once. A supervisor may submit revised or additional 146 requests if the emergency situation in his or her affected 147 county changes. The Secretary of State shall approve or deny the 148 requests in writing within 36 hours after receipt. In deciding 149 whether to approve the requests, the Secretary of State shall 150 consider the severity of the natural emergency, the damage to 151 the impacted area, the extent of voter displacement, whether 152 voters in an affected area have an equal opportunity to cast a 153 ballot, and any factor that could impede voter access or 154 transport to polling places, early voting sites, or supervisor 155 offices. If the Secretary of State fails to approve or deny a 156 request within the 36-hour period, the request is deemed 157 approved. The Secretary of State shall publish each approval and 158 denial on the departmentâs website as soon as practicable. The 159 department shall maintain an official record of all requests 160 submitted under subsection (1), together with all approvals and 161 denials, for public inspection pursuant to chapter 119 and shall 162 compile such records in a format that facilitates review and 163 analysis to strengthen future contingency planning and the 164 development of best practices in election administration. Such 165 records must also be used to inform the election emergency 166 training program and best practices workgroup required under s. 167 101.736. 168 (3)âIf the Governor declares a state of emergency pursuant 169 to s. 252.36 less than 60 days before an election, the 170 supervisor of a county included in the state of emergency 171 declaration may take any of the following actions necessary 172 while the emergency declaration continues to include the county 173 as an affected area, upon provision of notice to the Secretary 174 of State: 175 (a)âNotwithstanding the designation deadline in s. 176 101.657(1)(b), change the location of designated early voting 177 sites. The notice must identify the new address of each early 178 voting site and the hours during which early voting will occur 179 at each site. 180 (b)âNotwithstanding the early voting site locations 181 specifically authorized in s. 101.657(1), designate early voting 182 sites at other locations in areas of the county where eligible 183 early voting locations are unavailable. The notice must set 184 forth sufficient facts to establish that a sufficient number of 185 early voting sites that were designated or that may be 186 designated under paragraph (a) are unavailable due to the 187 emergency. For purposes of this paragraph, reasons that an early 188 voting site may be unavailable include, but are not limited to, 189 the site no longer being safe for occupancy, the site being 190 located in an area that is currently dangerous or difficult to 191 travel to and from, or the site lacking adequate utilities. An 192 early voting site designated under this paragraph must, to the 193 maximum extent practicable, be geographically located so as to 194 provide all voters in the area with an equal opportunity to cast 195 a ballot. 196 (c)âIf the supervisor determines that a poll worker 197 shortage exists, appoint poll workers who have not met the 198 training requirements in s. 102.014. However, such poll workers 199 must have received the required training within the previous 2 200 years. 201 (d)âSend a vote-by-mail ballot to a voter who has requested 202 such ballot: 203 1.âBy forwardable mail or to an address other than the 204 address listed for the voter in the statewide voter registration 205 system. 206 2.âNotwithstanding s. 101.62(1)(a) and (b), without the 207 voterâs written request or if a written request is not signed. 208 3.âNotwithstanding s. 101.62(3)(c), as soon as practicable. 209 Section 4.âSection 101.733, Florida Statutes, is amended to 210 read: 211 101.733âEmergency suspension or delay of an election 212 emergency; purpose; elections emergency contingency plan. 213 Because of the existing and continuing possibility of an 214 emergency or common disaster occurring before or during a 215 regularly scheduled or special election, and in order to ensure 216 maximum citizen participation in the electoral process and 217 provide a safe and orderly procedure for persons seeking to 218 exercise their right to vote, generally to minimize to whatever 219 degree possible a personâs exposure to danger during declared 220 states of emergency, and to protect the integrity of the 221 electoral process, it is hereby found and declared to be 222 necessary to designate a procedure for the emergency suspension 223 or delay and rescheduling of elections. 224 (1)âThe Governor may, upon issuance of an executive order 225 declaring a state of emergency or impending emergency, suspend 226 or delay any election. The Governor may take such action 227 independently or at the request of the Secretary of State, a 228 supervisor of elections from a county affected by the emergency 229 circumstances, or a municipal clerk from a municipality affected 230 by the emergency circumstances. 231 (2)âThe Governor, upon consultation with the Secretary of 232 State, shall reschedule any election suspended or delayed due to 233 an emergency. The election shall be held within 10 days after 234 the date of the suspended or delayed election or as soon 235 thereafter as is practicable. Notice of the election must be 236 published on the affected countyâs website as provided in s. 237 50.0311, on the affected supervisorâs website, on any official 238 social media account controlled by the supervisor or the 239 supervisorâs office, on the affected countyâs official social 240 media accounts, and or at least once in a newspaper of general 241 circulation in the affected area and, where practicable, 242 broadcast as a public service announcement on radio and 243 television stations at least 1 week before the date the election 244 is to be held. Contingency planning and procedures for elections 245 suspended or delayed under this section must be implemented in 246 accordance with s. 101.735. 247 (3)âThe Division of Elections of the Department of State 248 shall adopt, by rule, an elections emergency contingency plan, 249 which shall contain goals and policies that give specific 250 direction to state and local elections officials when an 251 election has been suspended or delayed due to an emergency. The 252 contingency plan shall be statewide in scope and shall address, 253 but not be limited to, the following concerns: 254 (a)âProviding a procedure for state and local elections 255 officials to follow when an election has been suspended or 256 delayed to ensure notice of the suspension or delay to the 257 proper authorities, the electorate, the communications media, 258 poll workers, and the custodians of polling places. 259 (b)âProviding a procedure for the orderly conduct of a 260 rescheduled election, whether municipal, county, district, or 261 statewide in scope; coordinating those efforts with the 262 appropriate elections official, and the members of the governing 263 body holding such election, if appropriate; and working with the 264 appropriate emergency management officials in determining the 265 safety of existing polling places or designating additional 266 polling places. 267 (c)âProviding a procedure for the release and certification 268 of election returns to the department for elections suspended or 269 delayed and subsequently rescheduled under the provisions of ss. 270 101.731-101.74. 271 Section 5.âSection 101.735, Florida Statutes, is created to 272 read: 273 101.735âElection emergency contingency plans.â 274 (1)âThe division shall adopt by rule a statewide election 275 emergency contingency plan to provide specific direction in the 276 event that an emergency occurs preceding or during an election. 277 At a minimum, the contingency plan must include procedures to 278 accomplish all of the following: 279 (a)âEnsure that necessary parties are notified of any 280 changes impacting an election that has been suspended, delayed, 281 rescheduled, or otherwise affected by an emergency. As used in 282 this paragraph, the term ânecessary partiesâ includes proper 283 authorities, the electorate, the media, poll workers, and 284 polling place custodians. 285 (b)âEnsure that an election that has been suspended, 286 delayed, rescheduled, or otherwise affected by an emergency is 287 conducted in a safe and orderly manner and include a plan to 288 coordinate the actions of the division, supervisors, county 289 canvassing boards and, if appropriate, members of the governing 290 body holding such election. 291 (c)âAssess the safety and accessibility of existing polling 292 places and, when necessary, designate additional polling places 293 in coordination with emergency management officials. 294 (d)âRelease and certify returns to the division for 295 elections suspended, delayed, rescheduled, or otherwise affected 296 by an emergency. 297 (e)âCoordinate efforts between supervisors in affected and 298 unaffected counties to ensure voting opportunities for affected 299 voters, including ensuring the delivery of vote-by-mail ballots 300 to law enforcement officers, military personnel, first 301 responders, and utility line workers. 302 (2)âEach supervisor, in consultation with local emergency 303 management officials, shall develop a local election emergency 304 contingency plan. The plan must be submitted to the division for 305 approval by May 1 of every odd-numbered year. By May 30 of every 306 odd-numbered year, the division shall determine whether the plan 307 is sufficient under standard criteria adopted by rule. A 308 supervisor whose plan is deemed insufficient must submit a 309 revised plan within 30 days after notification. The criteria for 310 determining sufficiency must include minimum requirements for 311 postdisaster assessments, including community consultation to 312 evaluate the extent of impact on voter access. 313 (3)âContingency plans developed under this section must be 314 implemented in conjunction with ss. 101.733 and 101.738 to 315 ensure coordination of emergency powers and the availability of 316 necessary election equipment. 317 Section 6.âSection 101.736, Florida Statutes, is created to 318 read: 319 101.736âElection emergency training; best practices.â 320 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âtabletop exerciseâ 321 means a session in which participants are guided through 322 possible scenarios and discuss their roles and responsibilities 323 if such a scenario occurs, as well as how they would respond to 324 such a scenario. 325 (2)âThe Secretary of State, in coordination with 326 supervisors, shall develop an election emergency training 327 program. The training program is required for newly elected or 328 appointed supervisors and any critical staff, as determined by a 329 supervisor. The Secretary of State shall update such training at 330 least once every 4 years. 331 (3)âBy June 1 of every odd-numbered year, the Secretary of 332 State shall convene a workgroup to create a list of best 333 practices for conducting an election during or after an 334 emergency. In developing the list, the workgroup must review the 335 official records of requests, approvals, and denials maintained 336 under s. 101.7325(2) to identify lessons learned and 337 opportunities for improvement. The workgroup must: 338 (a)âInclude at least 10 current supervisors of elections; 339 and 340 (b)âParticipate in tabletop exercises involving election 341 emergencies. 342 (4)âUsing the list created under subsection (3), the 343 Secretary of State shall: 344 (a)âIncorporate practices applicable to all counties into 345 the statewide election emergency contingency plan under s. 346 101.735(1). 347 (b)âRecommend practices applicable to specific counties to 348 the applicable supervisor for inclusion in the supervisorâs 349 local election emergency contingency plan under s. 101.735(2). 350 Section 7.âSection 101.738, Florida Statutes, is created to 351 read: 352 101.738âStrategic elections equipment reserve.â 353 (1)âThe division shall maintain a secure strategic election 354 equipment reserve that may be deployed in the event of an 355 emergency or in the event of capacity issues due to unexpected 356 voter turnout. 357 (2)âAt a minimum, the reserve must include ballot marking 358 devices, scanners, tabulation equipment, ballot-on-demand 359 printers, paper required for voting machines and printers, 360 accessible voting equipment, electronic poll books, 361 uninterruptible power supplies, generators, cabling, and power 362 cords and may also include other related equipment necessary to 363 ensure continuity of elections, consistent with the voting 364 systems certified for use by each supervisor of elections. 365 (3)âIn lieu of maintaining a physical reserve of such 366 equipment, the division may contract with one or more certified 367 vendors of voting systems to provide such equipment on an as 368 needed basis. Any such contract must include all of the 369 following: 370 (a)âA guaranteed delivery timeframe no later than 24 hours 371 after a request by a supervisor of elections, the division, or 372 the department. 373 (b)âRequirements for secure transportation, installation, 374 and removal of equipment. 375 (c)âMaintenance of secure custody and detailed chain of 376 custody records for all equipment, consistent with s. 101.015 377 and related administrative rules, including documentation of 378 each transfer, installation, and removal and compliance with 379 applicable state cybersecurity and physical security standards. 380 (4)âThe division shall submit an annual report by February 381 1 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker 382 of the House of Representatives which includes all of the 383 following: 384 (a)âThe current inventory of equipment held in reserve or 385 available by vendor contract. 386 (b)âA list of all deployments of equipment under this 387 section during the prior calendar year, including the reason for 388 deployment, response time, and associated costs. 389 (c)âRecommendations for improvement to ensure readiness for 390 future elections. 391 Section 8.âSection 101.74, Florida Statutes, is amended to 392 read: 393 101.74âTemporary change of polling place in case of 394 emergency.âIn case of an emergency existing in any precinct at 395 the time of the holding of any election, the supervisor of 396 elections may establish, at any safe, accessible, and convenient 397 point outside such precinct, an additional polling place for the 398 electors of that precinct, in which place the qualified electors 399 may vote. The qualified electors of the affected precinct may 400 vote at such location, and the registration books of the 401 affected precinct shall be applicable to, and shall be used at, 402 the polling place so established. The supervisor shall provide 403 notice of the temporary polling place change through signage at 404 the original site, the supervisorâs website and related social 405 media accounts, and other reasonable means, such as signage at 406 nearby emergency shelters or temporary housing locations, to 407 inform affected voters. In exercising this authority, the 408 supervisors of elections may coordinate with emergency 409 management officials under s. 101.735 or apply relevant best 410 practices developed under s. 101.736, but such coordination is 411 not a prerequisite to action under this section. 412 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.